District of Columbia statutes.
15-717

Marriage license and related fees.

For each marriage license, the fee shall be $2; for each certified copy of a marriage license return, the fee shall be $1; for each certified copy of application for marriage license the fee shall be $1; and for registering authorizations to perform marriages and issuing certificate, the fee shall be $1.

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia may, by rule of court, increase or decrease fees provided by this section.

History

July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 265, Pub. L. 89-493, § 13(d)(2)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 554, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(17)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-717.
1973 Ed., § 15-717.